District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.251

Schools Technology Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Schools Technology Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Office of the State Superintendent of Education in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of appropriated amounts.

(c)

(1)

The Fund shall be used to improve technology at District of Columbia Public Schools and District of Columbia Public Charter Schools.

(2)

For fiscal year 2014, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall distribute the amounts in the fund to local education agencies (“LEAs”) on a per-pupil basis, based on the Fall 2012 audited enrollment.

(3)

In fiscal year 2015 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall distribute any amounts in the fund to LEAs on a per-pupil basis, based on the audited enrollment for the preceding school year.

(d)

By November 15 of each year, each LEA receiving money from the Fund shall submit to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education a report of all expenditures from the Fund for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include the following information:

(1)

A detailed description of the equipment or software that was purchased by the LEA with money from the Fund, including the cost associated with each piece of equipment or software; and

(2)

A detailed description of the technological improvements that were made to the LEA’s school facilities using money from the Fund.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 10005, 60 DCR 12472
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4012, 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added (d).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 10005 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 10005 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4012 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
Section 10001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Title X of the act may be cited as the “Revised Revenue Estimate Adjustment Allocation Act of 2013”.